inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>n #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+ExclO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@s1%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1SgO:@R.Person.1@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@s1%>%>igo%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
